src/morphology/affixes/affixes-verbs-moh.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------

LEXICON Verbs
<0:ppStart> SimplePresent ;

LEXICON SimplePresent
Active+:0   RedPrefixes   ; !! red prefixes f
Passive+AgentSg3Neuter+:0 BluePrefixes  ; !! blue prefixes
Transitive:0    PurplePrefixes   ; !! purple prefixes

LEXICON RedPrefixes
@U.VerbType.Red@    BoundPronounActive;

LEXICON BluePrefixes
@U.VerbType.Blue@    BoundPronounPassive;

LEXICON PurplePrefixes
@U.VerbType.Purple@    BoundPronounRelation;


!!------------------ ACTIVE VERBS (RED PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounActive
AgentSg1+:ke EndActive   ;
AgentSg2+:se EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Mal+:ra EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Fem+:ye EndActive   ;
AgentSg3Neuter+:ka EndActive   ;
AgentDu21+:teni EndActive   ;
AgentDu31+:yakeni EndActive   ;
AgentDu2+:seni EndActive   ;
AgentDu3+:ni EndActive    ;
AgentDu3Fem+:keni EndActive   ;
AgentPl2Sg1+:tewa EndActive   ;
AgentPl3Sg1+:yakwa EndActive   ;
AgentPl2+:sewa EndActive   ;
AgentPl3+:rati EndActive   ;
AgentPl3Fem+:konti EndActive   ;

LEXICON EndActive
PatSg3Neuter+:0 VerbStem   ; !! put a neutral patient for all active verbs

!!------------------ PASSIVE VERBS (BLUE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounPassive
PatSg1+:wake EndPassive   ;
PatSg2+:sa EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ro EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Fem+:yako EndPassive   ;
PatSg3Neuter+:yo EndPassive   ; 
PatDu21+:yonkeni EndPassive   ;
PatDu31+:yonkeni EndPassive   ; 
PatDu2+:seni EndPassive   ; 
PatDu3+:roti EndPassive   ;
PatDu3Fem+:yoti EndPassive   ;
PatPl2Sg1+:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
PatPl3Sg1+:yonkwa EndPassive   ;
PatPl2+:sewa EndPassive   ;
PatPl3+:roti EndPassive   ;
PatPl3Fem+:yoti EndPassive   ;

LEXICON EndPassive
VerbStem   ; 

!!------------------ RELATION OR TRANSITIVE VERBS (PURPLE PREFIXES) --------------
LEXICON BoundPronounRelation
AgentSg1+:0 RelationPronI   ;
AgentSg2+:0 RelationPronYou   ;

LEXICON RelationPronI
PatSg2+:kon EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:ri EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:khe EndRelation   ;


LEXICON RelationPronYou
PatSg1+:take EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Mal+:etshe EndRelation   ;
PatSg3Fem+:she EndRelation   ;


LEXICON EndRelation
VerbStem   ; 


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
